Louisiana, session 2026, HB8.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:186(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§186. Authorization for staff to attend executive sessions
* * *
B.(1) An authorization made pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall
be made in writing, specifically name the legislative staff member or members
authorized to attend such executive sessions, and be submitted to the director of the
state or statewide retirement system board whose executive sessions staff shall be
authorized to attend. Such authorization shall be valid for one calendar year four
calendar years from the date of submission, unless modified or revoked as provided
in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(2) The chairman of the House Committee on Retirement and the chairman
of the Senate Committee on Retirement are authorized to revoke or modify any
written authorization made pursuant to this Section at any time by providing written
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 8 ENROLLED
notice to the director of the affected board. A revocation shall immediately
terminate the authorization made pursuant to this Section. A modification shall act
as a new written authorization and shall be valid for one calendar year four calendar
years from the date submitted.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.